District of Columbia statutes.
46-710

Repealed

Duty of Court when District is initiating state.

Repealed.

July 10, 1957, 71 Stat. 287, Pub. L. 85-94, § 10
Feb. 9, 1996, D.C. Law 11-81, § 902, 42 DCR 6748
1981 Ed., § 30-310.
1973 Ed., § 30-310.